Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 9 Federal and State Funded Health Care Financing Programs Overview Committee

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2013, Article 9 of Chapter 8 of Title 31 as enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 586, § 1/SB 14, was redesignated as Article 10 of Chapter 8 of Title 31.

31-8-210.
[Reserved] Committee established; composition; officers; terms of office; duties and responsibilities; assistance from other state officers and agencies; compensation, per diem, and expense allowances; funding.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-8/HB 186, effective July 1, 2019, and by Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 9-1/HB 553, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

This article consisted of Code Section

31-8-210

, relating to federal and state funded health care financing programs overview committee, and was based on Code 1981, §

31-8-210

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 1037, § 3/SB 62.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 9-2/HB 553, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Any assets of the Federal and State Funded Health Care Financing Programs Overview Committee existing as of June 30, 2019, shall devolve by operation of law and without further action to the State of Georgia on July 1, 2019. Any liabilities and obligations of the Federal and State Funded Health Care Financing Programs Overview Committee existing as of June 30, 2019, shall be transferred to and assumed by the State of Georgia, by such instruments as may be required to maintain the same.”